Florida, session 2026, SB820.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âSection 43.51, Florida Statutes, is amended to 21 read: 22 43.51âProblem-solving court reports.â 23 (1)âThe Office of the State Courts Administrator shall 24 provide an annual report to the President of the Senate and the 25 Speaker of the House of Representatives on problem-solving 26 courts no later than January 31 of each year for the previous 27 fiscal year. The report must: 28 (a)âProvide all of the following information for each 29 problem-solving court: 30 1.âwhich details The number of participants for the in each 31 problem-solving court for each fiscal year. the court has been 32 operating and 33 2.âThe types of services provided., 34 3.âidentifies Each source of funding for the each court 35 during each fiscal year., and 36 4.âprovides Information on the performance of the each 37 court based upon outcome measures established by the courts. 38 (b)âProvide all of the following uniform aggregate data for 39 each problem-solving court: 40 1.âThe number of participants. 41 2.âParticipant primary offense that resulted in the court 42 program referral or sentence, if applicable. 43 3.âTreatment compliance. 44 4.âProgram completion status and reasons for any failure to 45 complete. 46 5.âOffenses committed during program participation, if 47 applicable. 48 6.âFrequency of court appearances. 49 7.âUnits of service. 50 8.âParticipant changes in the status of employment, 51 housing, and child custody during program participation. 52 9.âOther uniform information that demonstrates the 53 effectiveness of the program. 54 (2)âFor purposes of this section, the term âproblem-solving 55 courtâ includes, but is not limited to, a drug court pursuant to 56 s. 397.334, s. 948.01, s. 948.06, s. 948.08, s. 948.16, or s. 57 948.20; a dependency drug court pursuant to s. 39.507 or s. 58 39.521; an early childhood court pursuant to s. 39.01304; a 59 veterans treatment court program pursuant to s. 394.47891, s. 60 948.08, s. 948.16, or s. 948.21; a mental health court program 61 pursuant to s. 394.47892, s. 948.01, s. 948.06, s. 948.08, or s. 62 948.16; a community court pursuant to s. 948.081; or a 63 delinquency pretrial intervention court program pursuant to s. 64 985.345. 65 Section 2.âPresent subsection (2) of section 39.01304, 66 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (3), and a new 67 subsection (2) is added to that section, to read: 68 39.01304âEarly childhood court programs.â 69 (2)âEach early childhood court program shall collect the 70 data and information prescribed in s. 43.51(1) for purposes of 71 program evaluation. In addition, early childhood court programs 72 shall collect the number of admissions and terminations, 73 referral and screening procedures, eligibility criteria, type 74 and duration of treatment offered, and residential treatment 75 resources. Each early childhood court program shall report 76 annually to the Office of the State Courts Administrator the 77 data and information required to be collected under this 78 subsection. 79 Section 3.âPresent subsection (12) of section 394.47891, 80 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (13), and a new 81 subsection (12) is added to that section, to read: 82 394.47891âVeterans treatment court programs.â 83 (12)âPROGRAM DATA.âEach veterans treatment court program 84 shall collect the data and information prescribed in s. 43.51(1) 85 for purposes of program evaluation. In addition, veterans 86 treatment court programs shall collect the number of admissions 87 and terminations, referral and screening procedures, eligibility 88 criteria, type and duration of treatment offered, and 89 residential treatment resources. Each veterans treatment court 90 program shall report annually to the Office of the State Courts 91 Administrator the data and information required to be collected 92 under this subsection. 93 Section 4.âParagraph (b) of subsection (5) of section 94 394.47892, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 95 394.47892âMental health court programs.â 96 (5) 97 (b)âEach mental health court program shall collect the 98 sufficient client-level data and programmatic information 99 prescribed in s. 43.51(1) for purposes of program evaluation. In 100 addition, mental health court programs shall collect the number 101 of admissions and terminations, Client-level data includes 102 primary offenses that resulted in the mental health court 103 program referral or sentence, treatment compliance, completion 104 status and reasons for failure to complete, offenses committed 105 during treatment and the sanctions imposed, frequency of court 106 appearances, and units of service. Programmatic information 107 includes referral and screening procedures, eligibility 108 criteria, type and duration of treatment offered, and 109 residential treatment resources. Each mental health court 110 program shall report annually to the Office of the State Courts 111 Administrator the data and information required to be collected 112 under this paragraph The programmatic information and aggregate 113 data on the number of mental health court program admissions and 114 terminations by type of termination shall be reported annually 115 by each mental health court program to the Office of the State 116 Courts Administrator. 117 Section 5.âParagraph (b) of subsection (6) of section 118 397.334, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 119 397.334âTreatment-based drug court programs.â 120 (6) 121 (b)âEach treatment-based drug court program shall collect 122 the sufficient client-level data and programmatic information 123 prescribed in s. 43.51(1) for purposes of program evaluation. In 124 addition, treatment-based drug court programs shall collect the 125 number of admissions and terminations, Client-level data 126 includes primary offenses that resulted in the treatment-based 127 drug court program referral or sentence, treatment compliance, 128 completion status and reasons for failure to complete, offenses 129 committed during treatment and the sanctions imposed, frequency 130 of court appearances, and units of service. Programmatic 131 information includes referral and screening procedures, 132 eligibility criteria, type and duration of treatment offered, 133 and residential treatment resources. Each treatment-based drug 134 court program shall must annually report annually to the Office 135 of the State Courts Administrator the data and programmatic 136 information required to be collected under this paragraph and 137 aggregate data on the number of treatment-based drug court 138 program admissions and terminations by type of termination to 139 the Office of the State Courts Administrator. 140 Section 6.âThe annual problem-solving court report prepared 141 by the Office of the State Courts Administrator (OSCA) pursuant 142 to s. 43.51, Florida Statutes, for the 2025-2026 fiscal year 143 must provide uniform aggregate data required by s. 43.51, 144 Florida Statutes, for at least 30 percent of problem-solving 145 courts funded by the state courts systemâs problem-solving 146 courts appropriation. The annual problem-solving court report 147 prepared by OSCA pursuant to s. 43.51, Florida Statutes, for the 148 2026-2027 fiscal year must provide uniform aggregate data 149 required by s. 43.51, Florida Statutes, for every problem 150 solving court funded by the state courts systemâs problem 151 solving court appropriation. For the 2027-2028 fiscal year, and 152 every fiscal year thereafter, the annual problem-solving court 153 report prepared by OSCA pursuant to s. 43.51, Florida Statutes, 154 must provide uniform aggregate data required by s. 43.51, 155 Florida Statutes, for all problem-solving courts. 156 Section 7.âThe amendments made by this act to ss. 39.01304, 157 394.47891, 394.47892, and 397.334, Florida Statutes, shall apply 158 to court programs funded by the state courts systemâs problem 159 solving court appropriation on the effective date of this act 160 and shall apply to all other court programs on July 1, 2027. 161 Section 8.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.